dev/nouns.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="bask/s__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kareiv/is__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ī</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiem</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiem</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ji</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiem</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ji</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dat/i__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oglek/lis__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļa</l>
          <r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lim</l>
          <r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lī</l>
          <r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļa</l>
          <r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lis</l>
          <r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="austrumi"><i>austrum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="basks"><i>bask</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dati"><i>dat</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dienvidaustrumi"><i>dienvidaustrum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dienvidrietumi"><i>dienvidrietum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="divdīgļlapis"><i>divdīgļlap</i><par n="kareiv/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dziedātājs"><i>dziedātāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="franči"><i>franč</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kareivis"><i>kareiv</i><par n="kareiv/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lietotājs"><i>lietotāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mācītājs"><i>mācītāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nokrišņi"><i>nokrišņ</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ogleklis"><i>oglek</i><par n="oglek/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pamats"><i>pamat</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pārstāvis"><i>pārstāv</i><par n="kareiv/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ražotājs"><i>ražotāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rietumi"><i>rietum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skābeklis"><i>skābek</i><par n="oglek/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skolotājs"><i>skolotāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="slāpeklis"><i>slāpek</i><par n="oglek/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="svētki"><i>svētk</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tapīrs"><i>tapīr</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uzvarētājs"><i>uzvarētāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vārti"><i>vārt</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="viduslaiki"><i>viduslaik</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zīdītājs"><i>zīdītāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ziemeļaustrumi"><i>ziemeļaustrum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ziemeļrietumi"><i>ziemeļrietum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Balkāni"><i>Balkān</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Himalaji"><i>Himalaj</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Limbaži"><i>Limbaž</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ozolnieki"><i>Ozolniek</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Preiļi"><i>Preiļ</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Suntaži"><i>Suntaž</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Talsi"><i>Tals</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
